Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA RIVER BASIN.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $1,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for a grant to Minnesota River Basin Projects for the state's share of a flood hazard mitigation grant for capital improvements to prevent or alleviate flood damage in Area II of the Minnesota River Basin. This appropriation is not available until the board determines that $1 has been committed from nonstate sources for every $3 of state grant. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $1,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end